Utah statutes.
63B-10-401.   Other capital facility authorizations and intent language.
(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  Utah State University use institutional funds to plan, design, and
construct an expansion of the HPER Building under the direction of the
director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless
supervisory authority has been delegated;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to
the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents
that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of
Regents policy R710.
(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the University of Utah use institutional funds to plan, design, and
construct the Moran Eye Center II project under the direction of the director
of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory
authority has been delegated;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to
the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents
that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of
Regents policy R710.
(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the University of Utah use institutional funds to plan, design, and
construct the E. E. Jones Medical Science Addition under the direction of the
director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless
supervisory authority has been delegated;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to
the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents
that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of
Regents policy R710.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the University of Utah use institutional funds to plan, design, and
construct a Museum of Natural History under the direction of the director of
the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory
authority has been delegated;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to
the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents
that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of
Regents policy R710.
(5)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  Dixie College use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct the
Hurricane Education Center under the direction of the director of the Division
of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has
been delegated;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the college may request state funds for operations and maintenance to the
extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that
the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of
Regents policy R710.
(6)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  Southern Utah University use institutional funds to plan, design, and
construct the Shakespearean Festival Center under the direction of the
director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless
supervisory authority has been delegated;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the college may not request state funds for operations and maintenance.
(7)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the Department of Corrections use donations to plan, design, and
construct the Wasatch Family History Center under the direction of the
director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless
supervisory authority has been delegated;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the department may request state funds for operations and maintenance.
(8)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the Department of Workforce Services use $1,186,700 from its Special
Administrative Expense Fund to plan, design, and construct an addition to the
Cedar City Employment Center under the direction of the director of the
Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory
authority has been delegated; and
(b)  the department may request state funds for operations and maintenance.
(9)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Division of Facilities
Construction and Management, acting on behalf of the Department of Natural
Resources, may enter into a lease purchase agreement with Carbon County to
provide needed space for agency programs in the area if the Department of
Natural Resources obtains the approval of the State Building Board by
demonstrating that the lease purchase will be a benefit to the state and that
the lease, including operation and maintenance costs, can be funded within
existing agency budgets.
